Wisconsin, session 2025, AB764.
do enact as follows:AB764,11Section 1. 138.14 (1) (g) of the statutes is repealed.AB764,22Section 2. 138.14 (1) (k) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB764,2,33138.14 (1) (k) “Payday loan” means a loan to which all of the following apply:AB764,2,541. The loan’s maturity date is not more than 6 months after the loan’s 5origination date.AB764,2,662. The loan is not secured by real property or other collateral.AB764,37Section 3. 138.14 (1) (km) of the statutes is created to read:AB764,2,108138.14 (1) (km) “Precomputed” means a transaction in which the debt is 9expressed as a single sum comprised of the amount financed and the finance charge 10computed in advance.AB764,411Section 4. 138.14 (9g) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,2,1412138.14 (9g) (a) 3. Provide to the applicant a copy of the written informational 13materials specified in sub. (9r) (a) to (f) and disclose to the applicant the availability 14of the financial literacy course under sub. (9r) (g).AB764,515Section 5. 138.14 (9g) (a) 7. of the statutes is created to read:AB764,2,1816138.14 (9g) (a) 7. Disclose to the applicant, in a clear and conspicuous 17manner, the payment plan and the amount of interest that will be paid over the 18course of the loan.AB764,61Section 6. 138.14 (9m) of the statutes is renumbered 138.14 (9m) (b).AB764,72Section 7. 138.14 (9m) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB764,3,83138.14 (9m) (a) Before entering into a payday loan with an applicant, the 4licensee shall undertake a reasonable underwriting process to verify the applicant’s 5ability to repay the payday loan. The licensee may not make a payday loan in an 6amount that exceeds the amount the applicant is capable of repaying, including 7principal and interest, as determined by the licensee’s underwriting process, or the 8amount established as provided in sub. (12) (b), whichever is less.AB764,89Section 8. 138.14 (9r) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB764,3,1210138.14 (9r) (g) The division shall develop or make available to the public a 11financial literacy course that includes material related to payday loans. The 12course’s duration shall be no more than 3 hours.AB764,913Section 9. 138.14 (10) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 138.14 (10) (a) 1r. 14and amended to read:AB764,3,1815138.14 (10) (a) 1r. Except as provided in Subject to subd. 2. and sub. (12) (b), 16this section imposes no limit on the interest that a licensee may not charge before 17the maturity date of an annual percentage rate of interest greater than 36 percent 18on a payday loan.AB764,1019Section 10. 138.14 (10) (a) 1g. of the statutes is created to read:AB764,3,2320138.14 (10) (a) 1g. For purposes of this paragraph, “annual percentage rate” 21shall be determined consistent with the provisions of section 107 of the federal 22Truth in Lending Act, 15 USC 1606, and federal Regulation Z adopted under that 23act, 12 CFR 226.AB764,111Section 11. 138.14 (10) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,4,82138.14 (10) (b) 2. A licensee may present a customer’s check for a periodic 3payment no more than once. For each customer authorization to initiate an 4electronic fund transfer from the customer’s account, a licensee may initiate an 5electronic fund transfer for a periodic payment no more than once. The only charge 6that a licensee may impose for dishonor of a customer’s check or denial of the 7licensee’s instruction to execute an electronic fund transfer is a service charge that 8does not exceed $15.AB764,129Section 12. 138.14 (10) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB764,4,1010138.14 (10) (c) Precomputed. All payday loans shall be precomputed.AB764,1311Section 13. 138.14 (11) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,4,1912138.14 (11) (b) Upon prepayment in full by cash, renewal, refinancing, or 13otherwise, a refund of the unearned portion of any interest assessed by the licensee 14finance charge must be allowed. The amount of such refund shall not be less than 15the difference between the interest charged and the interest earned at the agreed 16rate computed upon the unpaid principal balance of the loan from time to time 17outstanding prior to repayment in full the earned finance charge shall be based on 18the ratio of the number of days the loan was outstanding to the number of days for 19which the loan was originally contracted.AB764,1420Section 14. 138.14 (12) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,5,321138.14 (12) (b) No licensee may make a payday loan to a customer that results 22in the customer having an outstanding aggregate liability in principal, interest, 23and all other fees and charges, to all licensees who have made payday loans to the 1customer of more than $1,500 or 35 percent of the customer’s gross monthly income, 2whichever is less. As provided in sub. (9m) (b), a licensee may rely on a consumer 3report to verify a customer’s income for purposes of this paragraph.AB764,154Section 15. 138.14 (12) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,5,115138.14 (12) (f) If a check held received by a licensee as a result of payment on 6a payday loan is dishonored, or an instruction to execute an electronic funds 7transfer authorized as the result of payment on a payday loan is denied, the licensee 8may bring an action to collect the amount of the check or electronic funds transfer, 9but may not threaten or pursue criminal action against a debtor as a result of the 10debtor’s dishonored check or denied electronic funds transfer or the debtor’s payday 11loan not being paid.AB764,1612Section 16. 138.14 (12) (g) and (h) of the statutes are created to read:AB764,5,1413138.14 (12) (g) No licensee may make or offer to make a payday loan for which 14the maturity date is less than 90 days after the loan’s origination date.AB764,5,1715(h) No licensee may make or offer to make a payday loan unless the loan 16agreement requires the loan to be repaid in substantially equal periodic payments 17over substantially equal intervals.AB764,1718Section 17. 138.14 (13) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB764,6,419138.14 (13) (d) No payday loan, wherever made, for which a greater rate or 20amount of interest than is allowed under sub. (10) (a) 2. has been contracted for or 21received, may be enforced in this state, and every person in any way participating 22therein in this state shall be subject to this section. If a licensee makes an excessive 23charge of such interest as the result of an unintentional mistake, but upon demand 1makes correction of such mistake, the loan shall be enforceable and treated as if no 2violation occurred at the agreed rate. Nothing in this paragraph shall limit any 3greater rights or remedies afforded in chs. 421 to 427 to a customer in a consumer 4credit transaction.AB764,185Section 18. 138.14 (14) (m) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab764 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab764 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB764 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB764 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB764: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting